Colorado, session 2026A, HB1161.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of local affairs
for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado
2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part XIII as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART XIII
DEPARTMENT OF LOCAL AFFAIRS
(1) EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S OFFICE
(A) Administration
Personal Services 2,287,742 2,287,742a
(20.2 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 3,524,736 1,111,506 584,209b 1,176,399a 652,622(I)
3,449,472 1,039,983 535,001b 1,217,687a 656,801(I)
Short-term Disability 13,492 4,269 2,240b 4,493a 2,490(I)
Paid Family Medical Leave
Insurance 86,732 27,446 14,403b 28,879a 16,004(I)
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 1,927,383 609,920 320,061b 641,761a 355,641(I)
Salary Survey 528,895 167,369 87,828b 176,106a 97,592(I)
Step Pay 106,256 33,625 17,645b 35,380a 19,606(I)
PERA Direct Distribution 494,910 156,613 82,185b 164,791a 91,321(I)
Workers' Compensation 140,812 44,709 61,109b 34,994a
Operating Expenses 148,529 148,529a
Legal Services 1,385,051 1,045,466 338,288b 1,297a
Administrative Law Judge
Services 6,764 6,764b
Payment to Risk
Management and Property
Funds 157,407 49,978 68,311b 39,118a
Vehicle Lease Payments 158,338 70,101 67,125b 21,112a
127,248 56,336 53,945b 16,967a
Information Technology
Asset Maintenance 102,656 36,158 13,909b 52,589a
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1161

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Leased Space 8,000 5,675 2,325a
Capitol Complex Leased
Space 993,730 290,716 397,356b 183,395a 122,263(I)
Payments to OIT 4,062,128 1,252,188 1,465,200b 813,323a 531,417(I)
3,557,476 1,096,625 1,283,173b 712,281a 465,397(I)
CORE Operations 100,668 28,197 38,541b 22,071a 11,859(I)
Moffat Tunnel Improvement
District69 5,000 5,000c
16,239,229
15,628,223
a Of these amounts, $3,328,684 $3,270,978 shall be from the Local Government Mineral and Energy Impact Grants and Disbursements line item appropriation in the Division of Local
Government in this department, $1,930,606 $1,923,799 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401
(2), C.R.S., $560,455 shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries, and $14,559 $15,173 shall be transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing from the
Transfer to the Department of Local Affairs for Home Modifications Benefit Administration line item appropriation. Of the amount from the Local Government Mineral and Energy
Impact Grants and Disbursements line item, an estimated $1,830,776 $1,798,890 shall be from the Local Government Severance Tax Fund created in Section 39-29-110 (1)(a)(I), C.R.S.,
and an estimated $1,497,908 $1,472,088 shall be from the Local Government Mineral Impact Fund created in Section 34-63-102 (5)(a)(I), C.R.S.
b Of these amounts, $719,445(I) $659,378(I) shall be from the Affordable Housing Support Fund created in Section 29-32-103 (1), C.R.S., $283,547(I) $256,769(I) shall be from the
Housing Development Grant Fund created in Section 24-32-721 (1), C.R.S.,$164,266 $154,066 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.,
$147,766(I) $135,405(I) shall be from the Transformational Affordable Housing Revolving Loan Fund created in Section 24-32-731 (9)(a), C.R.S., $45,391 $45,116 shall be from the
Mobile Home Park Act Dispute Resolution and Enforcement Program Fund created in Section 38-12-1110 (1), C.R.S., $19,382(I) $17,640(I) shall be from the Mobile Home Park
Resident Empowerment Loan and Grant Program Fund created in Section 24-32-728 (10)(a), C.R.S., and $2,185,377 $2,052,385 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
Appropriations from the Affordable Housing Support Fund are shown for informational purposes only as the fund is continuously appropriated to the Department pursuant to Section
29-32-103 (1), C.R.S., appropriations from the Housing Development Grant Fund are shown for informational purposes only as the fund is continuously appropriated to the Department
pursuant to Section 24-32-721 (1), C.R.S., appropriations from the Transformational Affordable Housing Revolving Loan Fund are shown for informational purposes only as the fund
is continuously appropriated to the Department pursuant to Section 24-32-731 (9)(c), C.R.S., and appropriations from the Mobile Home Park Resident Empowerment Loan and Grant
Program Fund are shown for informational purposes only as the fund is continuously appropriated to the Department pursuant to Section 24-32-728 (10)(c), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Moffat Tunnel Cash Fund created in Section 32-8-126 (1), C.R.S.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1161

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(B) State Demography Office
Program Costs 685,392 545,663 117,479(I)a 22,250(I)
(6.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 14,284 11,997(I)a 2,287(I)
699,676
a These amounts are from the Conservation Trust Fund created in Section 29-21-101 (2)(a)(I), C.R.S., pursuant to Section 3 (1)(b)(I) of Article XXVII of the State Constitution. These
funds are from net lottery proceeds and are included for informational purposes, as net lottery proceeds are continuously appropriated to the Department. Further, pursuant to Section
24-77-102 (17)(b)(IX), C.R.S., net lottery proceeds are not subject to the limitation on state fiscal year spending set forth in Article X, Section 20, of the State Constitution.
16,938,905
16,327,899
(2) PROPERTY TAXATION
Division of Property
Taxation 3,850,464 2,416,722 1,180,620a 253,122b
(39.0 FTE)
State Board of Equalization 12,856 12,856
Board of Assessment
Appeals 865,719 626,965 238,754c
(14.2 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 114,999 97,007d 17,992b
4,844,038
a This amount shall be from the Property Tax Exemption Fund created in Section 39-2-117 (8), C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be from the Local Government Mineral and Energy Impact Grants and Disbursements line item appropriation in the Division of Local Government in this
department. Of the total, an estimated $149,113 shall be from the Local Government Severance Tax Fund created in Section 39-29-110 (1)(a)(I), C.R.S., and an estimated $122,001
shall be from the Local Government Mineral Impact Fund created in Section 34-63-102 (5)(a)(I), C.R.S.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1161

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
c Of this amount, $213,754 shall be from the Board of Assessment Appeals Cash Fund created in Section 39-2-125 (1)(h), C.R.S., and $25,000 shall be from the Accelerated Appeal
Cash Fund created in Section 39-2-125 (2.5)(b)(II), C.R.S.
d Of this amount, an estimated $79,053 shall be from the Property Tax Exemption Fund created in Section 39-2-117 (8), C.R.S., and an estimated $17,954 shall be from the Board of
Assessment Appeals Cash Fund created in Section 39-2-125 (1)(h), C.R.S.
(3) DIVISION OF HOUSING70
(A) Community and Non-Profit Services
(1) Administration
Personal Services 3,975,596 1,233,545 84,842a 260,660b 2,396,549(I)
(36.9 FTE)
Operating Expenses 469,181 59,230 4,938c 64,918b 340,095(I)
(2) Community Services
Low Income Rental
Subsidies71 105,997,404 21,167,475 939,649d 83,890,280(I)
Homeless Prevention
Programs 2,306,506 170,000e 2,136,506(I)
Appropriation to the Child
Care Facility Development
Cash Fund 500,000 250,000 250,000f
(0.9 FTE)
(3) Fort Lyon Supportive
Housing Program 5,762,544 5,762,544
(1.0 FTE)
(4) Ridge View Campus 5,306,832 5,306,832(I)g
(3.7 FTE)
124,318,063
a Of this amount, $66,098 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., $12,500 shall be from the Homeless Prevention Activities Program
Fund created in Section 39-22-1302 (1), C.R.S., and $6,244 shall be from the Private Activity Bond Allocations Fund created in Section 24-32-1709.5 (2)(a), C.R.S.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1161

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
b These amounts shall be transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing from the Transfer to the Department of Local Affairs for Host Home Regulation line
item appropriation.
c Of this amount, $2,500 shall be from the Homeless Prevention Activities Program Fund created in Section 39-22-1302 (1), C.R.S., and $2,438 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash
Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
e This amount shall be from the Homeless Prevention Activities Program Fund created in Section 39-22-1302 (1), C.R.S.
f This amount shall be from the Child Care Facility Development Cash Fund created in Section 24-32-3805 (1)(a), C.R.S. This fund consists of General Fund that is appropriated in this
line item to the Fund.
g This amount shall be transferred from the Proposition 123 Programs for Affordable Home Ownership and Persons Experiencing Homelessness line item appropriation within this
division.
(B) Field Services
Affordable Housing
Program Costs72 3,513,601 250,606 97,047a 2,429,547b 736,401(I)
(30.8 FTE)
Affordable Housing
Construction Grants and
Loans pursuant to Section
24-32-721, C.R.S.71, 72 75,199,716 18,000,000 40,500,000(I)c 16,699,716(I)
Housing Assistance for
Persons Transitioning
from the Criminal or
Juvenile Justice
System71 500,000 500,000
Manufactured Buildings
Program 1,691,562 1,691,562d
(15.3 FTE)
Mobile Home Park Act
Oversight 1,536,137 1,536,137e
(10.5 FTE)
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1161

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Appropriation to the Mobile
Home Park Act Dispute
Resolution and Enforcement
Program Fund 119,905 119,905
(1.0 FTE)
Proposition 123 Programs
for Affordable Home
Ownership and Persons
Experiencing Homelessness 133,532,000 133,532,000(I)f
216,092,921
a This amount shall be from the Private Activity Bond Allocations Fund created in Section 24-32-1709.5 (2)(a), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $1,755,000 shall be from the Affordable Housing Construction Grants and Loans pursuant to Section 24-32-721, C.R.S., line item appropriation within this division,
which amount includes $1,215,000 originating as money credited in accordance with Section 39-26-123 (3)(b), C.R.S., and $540,000 originating as General Fund, $375,225 shall be
from the Local Government Mineral and Energy Impact Grants and Disbursements line item appropriation in the Division of Local Government in this department, and $299,322 shall
be transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing from the Transfer to the Department of Local Affairs for Home Modifications Benefit Administration line item
appropriation. Of the amount from the Local Government Mineral and Energy Impact Grants and Disbursements line item, an estimated $206,374 shall be from the Local Government
Severance Tax Fund created in Section 39-29-110 (1)(a)(I), C.R.S., and an estimated $168,851 shall be from the Local Government Mineral Impact Fund created in Section 34-63-102
(5)(a)(I), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Housing Development Grant Fund created in Section 24-32-721 (1), C.R.S., from money credited to the Fund in accordance with Section 39-26-123
(3)(b), C.R.S. This money is continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 24-32-721 (1), C.R.S., and is shown for informational purposes only.
d This amount shall be from the Building Regulation Fund created in Section 24-32-3309 (1)(a)(III), C.R.S.
e This amount shall be from the Mobile Home Park Act Dispute Resolution and Enforcement Program Fund created in Section 38-12-1110 (1), C.R.S.
f This amount shall be from Affordable Housing Support Fund created in Section 29-32-103 (1), C.R.S. This money is continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 29-32-103 (1),
C.R.S., and is shown for informational purposes only.
(C) Indirect Cost
Assessment 1,673,984 1,070,563a 163,062b 440,359(I)
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1161

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of this amount, an estimated $413,350(I) shall be from the Affordable Housing Support Fund created in Section 29-32-103 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $228,404 shall be from the Mobile
Home Park Act Dispute Resolution and Enforcement Program Fund created in Section 38-12-1110 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $183,847 shall be from the Building Regulation Fund created
in Section 24-32-3309 (1)(a)(III), C.R.S., an estimated $150,867(I) shall be from the Housing Development Grant Fund created in Section 24-32-721 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $58,350(I)
shall be from the Transformational Affordable Housing Revolving Loan Fund created in Section 24-32-731 (9)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $14,376 shall be from the Private Activity Bond
Allocations Fund created in Section 24-32-1709.5 (2)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $11,406(I) shall be from the Mobile Home Park Resident Empowerment Loan and Grant Program Fund
created in Section 24-32-728 (10)(a), C.R.S., and an estimated $9,963 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S. Appropriations from the
Affordable Housing Support Fund are shown for informational purposes only as the fund is continuously appropriated to the Department pursuant to Section 29-32-103 (1), C.R.S.,
appropriations from the Housing Development Grant Fund are shown for informational purposes only as the fund is continuously appropriated to the Department pursuant to Section
24-32-721 (1), C.R.S., appropriations from the Transformational Affordable Housing Revolving Loan Fund are shown for informational purposes only as the fund is continuously
appropriated to the Department pursuant to Section 24-32-731 (9), C.R.S., and appropriations from the Mobile Home Park Resident Empowerment Loan and Grant Program Fund are
shown for informational purposes only as the fund is continuously appropriated to the Department pursuant to Section 24-32-728 (10)(c), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $152,267 shall be from the Affordable Housing Construction Grants and Loans pursuant to Section 24-32-721, C.R.S., line item appropriation within this division and
$10,795 shall be from the Local Government Mineral and Energy Impact Grants and Disbursements line item appropriation in the Division of Local Government in this department.
Of the amount from the Local Government Mineral and Energy Impact Grants and Disbursements line item, an estimated $5,937 shall be from the Local Government Severance Tax
Fund created in Section 39-29-110 (1)(a)(I), C.R.S., and an estimated $4,858 shall be from the Local Government Mineral Impact Fund created in Section 34-63-102 (5)(a)(I), C.R.S.
342,084,968
(4) DIVISION OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT
(A) Local Government and Community Services
(1) Administration
Personal Services 1,794,727 809,256 778,867a 206,604(I)
(7.6 FTE) (8.1 FTE) (2.5 FTE)
Operating Expenses 137,713 48,540 25,146a 64,027(I)
1,932,440
a These amounts shall be from the Local Government Mineral and Energy Impact Grants and Disbursements line item appropriation within this division. Of the total, an estimated
$442,207 shall be from the Local Government Severance Tax Fund created in Section 39-29-110 (1)(a)(I), C.R.S., and an estimated $361,806 shall be from the Local Government Mineral
Impact Fund created in Section 34-63-102 (5)(a)(I), C.R.S.
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1161

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(2) Local Government Services
Conservation Trust Fund
Disbursements 58,016,257 58,016,257(I)a
(1.0 FTE)
Volunteer Firefighter
Retirement Plans 4,295,000 4,295,000(I)b
Volunteer Firefighter Death
and Disability Insurance 30,000 30,000(I)c
Firefighter Heart and
Circulatory Malfunction
Benefits 2,714,866 1,375,813 1,339,053d
(0.5 FTE)
Local Utility Management
Assistance 217,196 217,196e
(2.0 FTE)
Environmental Protection
Agency Water/Sewer File
Project 267,248 267,248(I)
(0.5 FTE)
65,540,567
a This amount is from the Conservation Trust Fund created in Section 29-21-101 (2)(a)(I), C.R.S., pursuant to Section 3 (1)(b)(I) of Article XXVII of the State Constitution. These funds
are from net lottery proceeds and are included for informational purposes, as net lottery proceeds are continuously appropriated to the Department. Further, pursuant to Section 24-77-102
(17)(b)(IX), C.R.S., net lottery proceeds are not subject to the limitation on state fiscal year spending set forth in Article X, Section 20, of the State Constitution.
b This amount shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S. This amount is transferred from the proceeds of insurance premium taxes
pursuant to Section 31-30-1112 (2)(g), C.R.S., and shall be deemed not to be an appropriation subject to the limitation on General Fund appropriations set forth in Section 24-75-201.1,
C.R.S. Pursuant to Section 31-30-1112 (2)(i), C.R.S., this amount is included for informational purposes to comply with the limitation on state fiscal year spending imposed by Article
X, Section 20, of the State Constitution and Section 24-77-103, C.R.S.
c This amount is transferred from the proceeds of insurance premium taxes pursuant to Section 31-30-1112 (2)(i), C.R.S., and shall be deemed not to be an appropriation subject to the
limitation on General Fund appropriations set forth in Section 24-75-201.1, C.R.S.
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1161

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
d This amount shall be from the Firefighter Benefits Cash Fund created in Section 29-5-302 (11)(a), C.R.S. This fund consists of General Fund that is appropriated in this line item to
the Fund for the purpose of reimbursing employers for the direct costs of maintaining authorized benefits.
e This amount shall be from the Colorado Water Resources and Power Development Authority from money in the Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund created in Section 37-95-107.6
(1), C.R.S., and the Drinking Water Revolving Fund created in Section 37-95-107.8 (1), C.R.S.
(3) Community Services
Community Services Block
Grant 6,475,029 6,475,029(I)
Disaster Resilience
Rebuilding Program 249,938 249,938
(3.1 FTE)
Accessory Dwelling Unit
Fee Reduction and
Encouragement Grant
Program 2,275,397 2,275,397a
(4.7 FTE)
9,000,364
a This amount shall be from the Accessory Dwelling Unit Fee Reduction and Encouragement Grant Program Fund created in Section 29-35-405 (7)(a), C.R.S.
(B) Field Services
Program Costs73 3,884,591 389,743 132,385a 2,924,387b 438,076(I)
(3.1 FTE) (1.0 FTE) (24.2 FTE) (4.3 FTE)
Community Development
Block Grant 8,820,748 8,820,748(I)
Local Government Mineral
and Energy Impact Grants
and Disbursements 90,000,000 90,000,000(I)c
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1161

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Local Government Limited
Gaming Impact Grants 6,050,111 6,050,111(I)d
Local Government
Geothermal Energy Impact
Grants 50,000 50,000e
Rural Economic
Development
Initiative Grants 780,000 780,000
Gray and Black Market
Marijuana Enforcement
Grant Program 175,100 175,100f
(1.5 FTE)
Appropriation to the
Targeted Crime Reduction
Grant Program Cash Fund 6,000,000 3,000,000 3,000,000g
Appropriation to the Peace
Officers Behavioral Health
Support and Community
Partnership Fund 2,000,000 2,000,000
Peace Officers Behavioral
Health Support and
Community Partnership
Grant Program 2,005,836 2,005,836h
(1.0 FTE)
Defense Counsel on First
Appearance Grant Program 108,454 108,454
(0.5 FTE)
Law Enforcement
Community Services Grant
Program 1,169,412 1,169,412i
(1.0 FTE)
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1161

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Microgrids for Community
Resilience Grant Program 152,124 152,124
(2.0 FTE)
Appropriation to the Public
Defender and Prosecutor
Behavioral Health Support
Fund 500,000 500,000
Public Defender and
Prosecutor Behavioral
Health Support Grant
Program 500,000 500,000j
Proposition 123 Local
Planning Capacity Support 7,028,000 7,028,000(I)k
129,224,376
a This amount shall be from the Limited Gaming Impact Account within the Local Government Limited Gaming Impact Fund created in Section 44-30-1301 (1)(a), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Local Government Mineral and Energy Impact Grants and Disbursements line item appropriation within this division. Of the total, an estimated
$1,801,559 shall be from the Local Government Severance Tax Fund created in Section 39-29-110 (1)(a)(I), C.R.S., and an estimated $1,122,828 shall be from the Local Government
Mineral Impact Fund created in Section 34-63-102 (5)(a)(I), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, an estimated $49,500,000 shall be from the Local Government Severance Tax Fund created in Section 39-29-110 (1)(a)(I), C.R.S., and an estimated $40,500,000 shall
be from federal mineral leasing revenues transferred to the Local Government Mineral Impact Fund created in Section 34-63-102 (5)(a)(I), C.R.S., pursuant to Section 34-63-102 (5),
C.R.S. These amounts are included for informational purposes only as the Department is statutorily authorized to distribute money from these funds. As the Local Government Mineral
Impact Fund consists solely of federal mineral leasing revenues, money in this fund is not subject to the limitation on state fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of
the State Constitution.
d This amount shall be from the fund balance in the Local Government Limited Gaming Impact Fund created in Section 44-30-1301 (1)(a), C.R.S. This amount consists of funds
transferred from the Limited Gaming Fund in the Department of Revenue during the prior fiscal year pursuant to Section 44-30-701 (2)(a)(III), C.R.S., and is included for informational
purposes as the Department is statutorily authorized to distribute money from this fund.
e This amount shall be from the Geothermal Resource Leasing Fund created in Section 34-63-105 (1), C.R.S.
f This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
g This amount shall be from the Targeted Crime Reduction Cash Fund created in Section 24-32-120 (2)(i)(I), C.R.S.
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1161

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
h This amount shall be from the Peace Officers Behavioral Health Support and Community Partnership Fund created in Section 24-32-3501 (7)(a), C.R.S.
i This amount shall be from the Law Enforcement Community Services Grant Program Fund created in Section 24-32-124 (5)(b), C.R.S.
j This amount shall be from the Public Defender and Prosecutor Behavioral Health Support Fund created in Section 24-32-3502 (5)(a), C.R.S.
k This amount shall be from the Affordable Housing Support Fund created in Section 29-32-103 (1), C.R.S. This money is continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 29-32-103
(1), C.R.S., and is shown for informational purposes only.
(C) Indirect Cost
Assessments 658,465 112,349a 439,271b 106,845(I)
a Of this amount, $36,465(I) shall be from the Affordable Housing Support Fund created in Section 29-32-103 (1), C.R.S., $27,553 shall be from the Colorado Water Resources and
Power Development Authority from money in the Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund created in Section 37-95-107.6 (1), C.R.S., and the Drinking Water Revolving Fund created
in Section 37-95-107.8 (1), C.R.S., $20,938(I) shall be from the Conservation Trust Fund created in Section 29-21-101 (2)(a)(I), C.R.S., pursuant to Section 3 (1)(b)(I) of Article XXVII
of the State Constitution, $15,690 shall be from the Local Government Limited Gaming Impact Fund created in Section 44-30-1301 (1)(a), C.R.S., and $11,703 shall be from the Law
Enforcement Community Services Grant Program Fund created in Section 24-32-124 (5)(b), C.R.S. Appropriations from the Affordable Housing Support Fund are shown for
informational purposes only as the fund is continuously appropriated to the Department pursuant to Section 29-32-103 (1), C.R.S. Appropriations from the Conservation Trust Fund
are from net lottery proceeds and are included for informational purposes, as net lottery proceeds are continuously appropriated to the Department. Further, pursuant to Section 24-77-102
(17)(b)(IX), C.R.S., net lottery proceeds are not subject to the limitation on state fiscal year spending set forth in Article X, Section 20, of the State Constitution.
b Of this amount, $424,648 shall be from the Local Government Mineral and Energy Impact Grants and Disbursements line item appropriation within this division and $14,623 shall
be from the Peace Officers Behavioral Health Support and Community Partnership Fund created in Section 24-32-3501 (7)(a), C.R.S. Of the amount from the Local Government Mineral
and Energy Impact Grants and Disbursements line item, an estimated $233,556 shall be from the Local Government Severance Tax Fund created in Section 39-29-110 (1)(a)(I), C.R.S.,
and an estimated $191,092 shall be from the Local Government Mineral Impact Fund created in Section 34-63-102 (5)(a)(I), C.R.S.
206,356,212
TOTALS PART XIII
(LOCAL AFFAIRS) $570,224,123 $65,323,315a $4,295,000b $350,068,976c $25,592,997 $124,943,835d
$569,613,117 $65,082,464a $349,824,561c $25,529,098 $124,881,994d
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1161

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of this amount, $30,000 contains an (I) notation. This amount is included for purposes of complying with the limitation on state fiscal year spending imposed by Article X, Section
20, of the State Constitution. As this amount is continuously appropriated by a permanent statute or constitutional provision, it is not subject to the limitation on General Fund
appropriations as set forth in Section 24-75-201.1, C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S., and contains an (I) notation. This amount is included for purposes of complying
with the limitation on state fiscal year spending imposed by Article X, Section 20, of the State Constitution. As this amount is continuously appropriated by a permanent statute or
constitutional provision, it is not subject to the limitation on General Fund appropriations as set forth in Section 24-75-201.1, C.R.S.
c Of this amount, $337,117,360 $337,016,412 contains an (I) notation.
d This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
69 Department of Local Affairs, Executive Director's Office, Administration, Moffat Tunnel Improvement District -- It is the General Assembly's intent that the
Department continue its current practice of retaining lease payment revenues in the Moffat Tunnel Cash Fund and suspending distribution payments to
Improvement District counties because this practice ensures that funds remain available to cover any potential Improvement District Liabilities related to the
Tunnel and any costs related to renegotiation of the lease with Union Pacific Railroad in 2025 in order to protect the interests of the Improvement District and
the State.
70 Department of Local Affairs, Division of Housing -- It is the General Assembly's intent that the Department target state General Fund appropriations for
affordable housing to projects and clients that can be reasonably expected to reduce other State costs. It is the General Assembly's further intent that the
Department prioritize State-funded rental assistance for the following populations: Medicaid clients who are transitioning from a nursing home or long-term
care facility; clients transitioning from a State Mental Health Institute or a State-funded behavioral healthcare facility; and clients transitioning from the
Department of Corrections, the Division of Youth Services in the Department of Human Services, or a county jail.
71 Department of Local Affairs, Division of Housing, Community and Non-Profit Services, Community Services, Low Income Rental Subsidies; Field Services,
Affordable Housing Construction Grants and Loans pursuant to Section 24-32-721, C.R.S.; Housing Assistance for Persons Transitioning from the Criminal
or Juvenile Justice Systems -- It is the General Assembly's intent that the Department record expenditures for rental vouchers issued by the Division of Housing
within the Low Income Rental Subsidies line item.
72 Department of Local Affairs, Division of Housing, Field Services, Affordable Housing Program Costs; Affordable Housing Construction Grants and Loans
pursuant to Section 24-32-721, C.R.S. -- It is the General Assembly's intent that appropriations for State administration of affordable housing construction grants
and loans, including administration funding authorized pursuant to Section 24-32-721(3)(b), C.R.S., be expended in the Affordable Housing Program Costs
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1161

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
line item.
73 Department of Local Affairs, Division of Local Government, Field Services, Program Costs -- It is the General Assembly's intent that $462,500 of the
reappropriated funds in this line item appropriation be used for the Colorado Main Street Program.
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1161

SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1161